Ohio, session 136, HB429.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 3901.385 of the Revised Code be 5
amended to read as follows: 6
Sec. 3901.385. A third-party payer shall not do either any 7
of the following: 8
(A) Engage in any business practice that unfairly or 9
unnecessarily delays the processing of a claim or the payment of 10
any amount due for health care services rendered by a provider 11
to a beneficiary; 12
(B) Refuse to process or pay within the time periods 13
specified in section 3901.381 of the Revised Code a claim 14
submitted by a provider on the grounds the beneficiary has not 15
been discharged from the hospital or the treatment has not been 16
completed, if the submitted claim covers services actually 17
rendered and charges actually incurred over at least a thirty- 18
day period; 19
(C) Reduce the reimbursement made to a provider for the 20

H. B. No. 429 Page 2
As Introduced
provision of a covered health care service based on any of the 21
following: 22
(1) The third-party payer's own description of what is 23
included in that service outside of the most current CPT code in 24
effect, as published by the American medical association, the 25
most current ICD-10 code in effect, as published by the United 26
States department of health and human services, the most current 27
CDT code in effect, as published by the American dental 28
association, or the most current HCPCS code in effect, as 29
published by the United States centers for medicare and medicaid 30
services; 31
(2) The third-party payer's own description of what is 32
included in the diagnosis code submitted on the claim outside of 33
guidelines established by entities responsible for the code set, 34
including the centers for disease control and prevention's 35
national center for health statistics; 36
(3) That the provider billed for additional health 37
services, including outpatient surgery, on the same date as the 38
covered service. 39
Section 2. That existing section 3901.385 of the Revised 40
Code is hereby repealed. 41